Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 71

Investment Of Trust Funds

28-71-101. Fiduciaries' powers cumulative — Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act not affected.

The powers granted by this chapter to the fiduciaries named in this chapter shall be in addition to the powers existing by virtue of other acts heretofore enacted authorizing investments by fiduciaries.

This chapter shall not apply in any situation governed by the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, § 28-66-101 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

The Arkansas Trust Code: Good Law for Arkansas. 27 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 191.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 121, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-306.

28-71-102. Power of court not limited by chapter.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit the power of a court of competent jurisdiction to permit a fiduciary to take any action, or to restrain a fiduciary from taking any action, notwithstanding the permissions or restrictions contained in any written instrument under which the fiduciary is acting.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 121, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-304.

28-71-103. Fiduciaries subject to chapter.

Fiduciaries acting under authority granted before or after June 9, 1955, shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 121, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-305.

28-71-104. Additional authority to invest funds.

Unless prohibited by will, deed, trust, court order, or other instrument establishing the fiduciary relationship or unless another mode of investment is prescribed by any such instrument, trustees, guardians, and personal representatives, in addition to methods of investment now authorized by law, may invest all funds held in trust or for investment as provided in this chapter.

In addition to other investments authorized by law for the investment of funds held by a fiduciary, or by the instrument governing the fiduciary relationship, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, a bank or trust company acting as a fiduciary, agent, or otherwise may, in the exercise of its investment discretion or at the direction of another person authorized to direct investment of funds held by a bank or trust company as fiduciary, invest and reinvest in the securities of an open-end or closed-end management investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as amended, so long as the portfolio of the investment company or investment trust consists substantially of investments not prohibited by the governing instrument.

The fact that such a bank or trust company or an affiliate of the bank or trust company provides services to the investment company or investment trust such as that of an investment advisor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, manager, or otherwise and is receiving reasonable compensation for those services shall not preclude the bank or trust company from investing or reinvesting in the securities of the open-end or closed-end management investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as amended.

Cross References. Arkansas student loan authority bonds, legal and authorized investments, §6-81-120.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 121, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-301; Acts 1993, No. 482, § 1.

28-71-105. Standard of judgment and care — Prudent investor rule.

In acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling, and managing property held in a fiduciary capacity, other than trusts subject to the prudent investor rule as set forth in the Arkansas Trust Code, §28-73-101 et seq., the fiduciary shall exercise the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing which persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation, but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their capital.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 121, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 58-302; Acts 1997, No. 940, § 114; 2005, No. 1031, § 3.

28-71-106. Investments authorized.

Within the limitations of the standard set forth in § 28-71-105, a fiduciary is authorized to acquire and retain every kind of real, personal, or mixed property and every kind of investment, specifically including, but not by way of limitation, bonds, debentures, and other corporate obligations, preferred or common stocks, shares or interests in common trust funds, and securities of any open-end or closed-end management-type investment company or investment trust registered under the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, which persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence acquire or retain for their own account.

Whenever a fiduciary is authorized or required by the instrument, judgment, decree, or order establishing the fiduciary relationship to invest funds in specifically described securities, the fiduciary may, unless expressly prohibited by such an instrument, judgment, decree, or order, invest such funds in any investment company or investment trust described in subsection (a) of this section, the portfolio of which is limited to such specifically described securities and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such specifically described securities, provided that the investment company or investment trust takes delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized custodian.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, this subsection shall apply to all funds deposited with or controlled by any bank trustee acting in a fiduciary capacity in connection with the issuance, sale or redemption of bonds, notes, and other certificates of indebtedness.

Unless expressly prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, or order establishing the fiduciary relationship, a fiduciary may invest funds in certificates of deposit and savings accounts of any state bank or national bank whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and whose main office is in this state, including itself, if the fiduciary is a bank.

Whenever the express terms or limitations set forth in any instrument use the terms “legal investment” or “authorized investment” or words of similar import, the words shall be taken to mean any investment authorized or permitted by this section.

Consistent with the trustee's investment powers, a trustee may make temporary investments of funds in short-term interest-bearing obligations or deposits, or other short-term liquid investments. Trustees are authorized to charge reasonable fees for this service in addition to other compensation to which the trustee is entitled.

U.S. Code. The Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to in this section, is codified as 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Banking Law, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 547.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” preceding “of this state” in (a); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

Ark. L. Rev.

Haught, 1988 Update to the Arkansas Probate System: An Overview of Recent Developments in Arkansas Probate Practice, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 631.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Banking Law, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 547.

Effective Dates. Acts 1943, No. 71, § 4: approved Feb. 19, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “That since many persons have been captured by our enemies during this war and many persons are missing and their whereabouts are unknown, leaving indebtedness due them from contractors and other persons, and leaving dependents in this state who are in need and want, and many debtors are anxious to pay the amounts they owe such missing persons and persons imprisoned in any foreign country, an emergency is declared to exist, and it being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety that this act go into immediate operation, this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

History.

Acts 1955, No. 121, §§ 2, 3; 1977, No. 949, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 58-302, 58-303, 58-307; Acts 1989, No. 658, § 3; 1991, No. 668, § 2; 1993, No. 1025, § 1.

28-71-107. Limited investment in private venture capital projects authorized.

Unless prohibited by federal law or regulations promulgated thereunder, but notwithstanding any law or rule of this state to the contrary, fiduciaries and financial institutions may invest up to no more than two and one-half percent (2½%) of their funds eligible for investment, but not more than ten percent (10%) of their capital, including common capital stock, certified surplus, capital notes, and undivided profits, in Arkansas private venture capital projects without being in contravention of any prudent investor rule. This limitation is applicable only at the time of investment, and it shall not constitute a contravention of the prudent investor rule if investments in Arkansas private venture capital projects are in excess of this limitation by virtue of a reduction in the amount of funds eligible for investment.

The primary state regulators of the fiduciaries making such investments under this section shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this section.

(1)The prudent investor rule is embodied in several laws of this state pertaining to the investment of funds by financial institutions and fiduciaries, and the General Assembly has determined that the people of this state would benefit by the limited relaxation of the prudent investor rule to the extent that fiduciaries and financial institutions should be allowed to invest a small portion of their assets in private venture capital projects within this state.

It is the intent of this section to allow fiduciaries and financial institutions to invest up to two and one-half percent (2½%) of their funds eligible for investment, but not more than ten percent (10%) of their capital, including common capital stock, certified surplus, capital notes, and undivided profits, in Arkansas private venture capital projects without incurring liability for violation of the prudent investor rule.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 905, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 58-308 — 58-310; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 3203.